New York, session 2025-2026, A2453.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1115 of the tax law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision (mm) to read as follows: 3 (mm) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 4 receipts from the sale of zero-emission school buses, as such term is 5 defined in section thirty-six hundred thirty-eight of the education law 6 and parts or equipment purchased and used in the operation of such buses 7 shall be exempt from taxes imposed by this article. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first day of a quarterly sales 9 tax period, as set forth in subdivision (b) of section 1136 of the tax 10 law, next commencing at least thirty days after this act shall have 11 become a law and shall apply in accordance with the applicable transi- 12 tional provisions of section 1106 of the tax law. Effective immediately, 13 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 14 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 15 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06215-01-5